District of Columbia statutes.
34-1604

Officer of company may be present at tests.

The company, person or persons furnishing the gas may, if they see fit, on each occasion of the testing of the gas by the Inspector, be represented by some officer, but such officer shall not interfere in the testing.

History

June 23, 1874, 18 Stat. 278, ch. 480, § 4
July 1, 1882, 22 Stat. 138, ch. 263, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1103.
1973 Ed., § 43-1203.